test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-aakíí_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - áákiiwa - ok : # -m animate noun, woman AEW NA1
     áákiiwa+NA+Sg: áákiiwa
     áákiiwa+NA+Pl: áákiiksi
     áákiiwa+NA+Obv: áákiiyi
     áákiiwa+NA+Non: áákií
     
     áákiiwa+NA+Px1Sg+Sg: nitaakííwa
     áákiiwa+NA+Px1Sg+Pl: nitaakííksi
     áákiiwa+NA+Px1Sg+Obv: nitaakííyi
     áákiiwa+NA+Px1Sg+Non: nitaakíí
     
     áákiiwa+NA+Px1Pl+Sg: nitaakíínnaana
     áákiiwa+NA+Px1Pl+Pl: nitaakíínnaaniksi
     áákiiwa+NA+Px1Pl+Obv: nitaakíínnaani
     áákiiwa+NA+Px1Pl+Non: nitaakíínnaani

     áákiiwa+NA+Px21Pl+Sg: kitaakíínnoona
     áákiiwa+NA+Px21Pl+Pl: kitaakíínnooniksi
     áákiiwa+NA+Px21Pl+Obv: kitaakíínnooni
     áákiiwa+NA+Px21Pl+Non: kitaakíínnooni

     áákiiwa+NA+Px2Sg+Sg: kitaakííwa
     áákiiwa+NA+Px2Sg+Pl: kitaakííksi
     áákiiwa+NA+Px2Sg+Obv: kitaakííyi
     áákiiwa+NA+Px2Sg+Non: kitaakíí

     áákiiwa+NA+Px2Pl+Sg: kitaakííyoaawa
     áákiiwa+NA+Px2Pl+Pl: kitaakííyoaawaiksi
     áákiiwa+NA+Px2Pl+Obv: kitaakííyoaawayi
     áákiiwa+NA+Px2Pl+Non: kitaakííyoaawai

     áákiiwa+NA+Px3Sg+Sg: otaakííwa
     áákiiwa+NA+Px3Sg+Pl: otaakííksi
     áákiiwa+NA+Px3Sg+Obv: otaakííyi
     áákiiwa+NA+Px3Sg+Non: otaakíí

     áákiiwa+NA+Px3Pl+Sg: otaakííyoaawa
     áákiiwa+NA+Px3Pl+Pl: otaakííyoaawaiksi
     áákiiwa+NA+Px3Pl+Obv: otaakííyoaawayi
     áákiiwa+NA+Px3Pl+Non: otaakííyoaawai
